Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-7101
Act, how cited.

Sections 71-7101 to 71-7113 shall be known and may be cited as the Critical Incident Stress Management Act.

Laws 1991, LB 703, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 536, § 107;

Laws 1997, LB 184, § 1.